src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON IV_PȮIMÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = pȯimõ:pūoimõ 41
!+IV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;
:  V-01_AIGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_PȮIMÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = pȯimõ:pūoimõ 41
!+TV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;
:  V-01_AIGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_OUŖÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = ouŗõ:ōŗõ 42
!+IV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;
:  V-01_AIGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_KEIJÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = keijõ:kējõ 43
!+IV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;
:  V-01_AIGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KEIJÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = keijõ:kējõ 43
!+TV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;
:  V-01_AIGÕ ;


LEXICON IV_AŖŠTÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = aŗštõ:āŗštõ 44
!+IV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;
:  V-01_AIGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_AŖŠTÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = aŗštõ:āŗštõ 44
!+TV:	V-01_AIGÕ	;
:  V-01_AIGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_PȮRTÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = pȯrtõ:pūortõ 45
!+TV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;
:  V-01_AIGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_OUTÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = outõ:ōtõ 46
!+TV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;
:  V-01_AIGÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_TUNDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = tundõ:tūndõ 47
:    V-01_AIGÕ       ;

LEXICON IV_TUNDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = tundõ:tūndõ 47
!+IV:	V-01_AIGÕ	;
:  V-01_AIGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_TUNDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = tundõ:tūndõ 47
!+TV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;
:  V-01_AIGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_OUDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = oudõ:ōdõ 48
!+TV:	V-01_AIGÕ	;
:  V-01_AIGÕ ;


LEXICON IV_KŪLÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = kūlõ:kūlõ 49
!+IV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;
: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KŪLÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = kūlõ:kūlõ 49
!+TV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;
: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_ARRÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = arrõ:arrõ 50
!+IV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;
: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_ARRÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = arrõ:arrõ 50
!+TV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;
: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_AʼILÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = aʼilõ:aʼilõ 51
!+IV: V-01_AʼILÕ ;
: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_AʼILÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = aʼilõ:aʼilõ 51
!+TV: V-01_AʼILÕ ;
: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_SVAʼRRÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = svaʼrrõ:svaʼrrõ 52
!+TV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;
: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_KĪTÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = kītõ:kīt 53
: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_KĪTÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = kītõ:kīt 53
!! ~701
!+IV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;
: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KĪTÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = kītõ:kīt 53
!+TV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;
: V-01_KŪLÕ ;


LEXICON IV_ÄʼBȚÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = äʼbțõ:äʼbț 54
!+IV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;
: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_ÄʼBȚÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = äʼbțõ:äʼbț 54
!+TV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;
: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

!LEXICON V_KŪLDÕ
! kūldõ:kūld 55
! V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_KŪLDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = kūldõ:kūld 55
: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_KŪLDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = kūldõ:kūld 55
!+IV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;
: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KŪLDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = kūldõ:kūld 55
!+TV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;
: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KĪSKÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = kīskõ:kīsk 56
!+TV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;
: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_ĪʼEDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = īʼedõ:īed 57
: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_ĪʼEDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = īʼedõ:īed 57
!+IV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;
: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_ĪʼEDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = īʼedõ:īed 57
!+TV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;
: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

!LEXICON V_UMBLÕ
! umblõ:umblõ 58
! V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_UMBLÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = umblõ: 58
!+IV: V-01_UMBLÕ ;
: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_UMBLÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = umblõ: 58
!+TV: V-01_UMBLÕ ;
: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_MÕTLÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = mõtlõ: 59
: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_MÕTLÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = mõtlõ: 59
!+IV: V-01_UMBLÕ ;
: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_MÕTLÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = mõtlõ: 59
!+TV: V-01_UMBLÕ ;
: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_MǞʼDLÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = mǟʼdlõ: 60
!+IV: V-01_UMBLÕ ;
: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_MǞʼDLÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = mǟʼdlõ: 60
!+TV: V-01_UMBLÕ ;
: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_NAʼGRÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = naʼgrõ: 60
!+IV: V-01_UMBLÕ ;
: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_NAʼGRÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = naʼgrõ: 60
!+TV: V-01_UMBLÕ ;
: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

!LEXICON V-AUX_ALĀ
! 62 alā:alā
!: K ;

LEXICON V-AUX_ÄʼB
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 62 äʼb:ä
+Neg: K ;

!LEXICON V-AUX_IʼZ
! 62 iʼz:ä
!+Neg: K ;

LEXICON TV_SÄ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 63 sä:sä
+TV: K ; ! FIXME 20230902

LEXICON V-AUX_PIḐĪKS
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 64 piḑīks:piḑī
: K ; ! FIXME 20230902

!! ## After transitive, intransitive, auxiliary and such tags have been added
!! 1

!! 2
LEXICON V-01_TǬʼDÕ
!! tǭʼdõ:tǭʼ
:d   GER_sõ   ;
   INF_dõ	  ;
   SUP-STEM_mõ	  ; !this provides INDPRSPL... 20230902 
   INDPRSSG1-STEM    ;
   
   INDCONNEGSG    ;
!! Prt
 INDPRT_žtõ    ;
! Cond
: COND ;
+Cond+ConNeg+Sg:%>ks K ;
+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1:%>ksmõ K ;
+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2:%>kstõ K ;
+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3:%>kstõ K ;
!! Imprt
	IMPRTSG2    ;
	IMPRTPL1	;
	IMPRTPL2	;
	IMPRTCONNEG ;
 IMPRTCONNEGSG2 ;
 IMPRTCONNEGPL2_gid ;
 


!! Jus
 JUS_gõ	;
!! Qvo
 QUO-STEM_ji	;

!! participles
:dõ ACTPRSPRC ;
 ACTPRFPRC_SG-nd/PL-nõd ;
: PSSPRSPRC ;
:%^VowsRM	PSSPRFPRCSG    ;


!! 3
LEXICON V-01_VĪDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = This is mutual for 3: 
!! vīdõ:vī
:d   GER_sõ   ;
   INF_dõ	  ;
   SUP-STEM_mõ	  ; 
   INDPRSSG1-STEM    ;
   INDCONNEGSG    ;
!! Prt
 INDPRT_ž    ;
! Cond
: COND ;
!! Imprt
	IMPRTSG2    ;
	IMPRTPL1	;
	IMPRTPL2	;
	IMPRTCONNEG ;
	IMPRTCONNEGSG2 ;
	IMPRTCONNEGPL2_gid ;

!! Jus
 JUS_gõ	;
!! Qvo
 QUO-STEM_ji	;

!! participles
 ACTPRSPRC ;
 ACTPRFPRC_SG-nd/PL-nõd ;

: PSSPRSPRC ;
:	PSSPRFPRCSG    ;


LEXICON V-01_NǞʼDÕ 
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = This is mutual for ??: 
!! 4 nǟʼdõ:nǟʼ
:d   GER_sõ   ;
   INF_dõ	  ;
:%^StodRM   SUP-STEM_mõ	  ; 
   INDPRSSG1-STEM    ;
   INDCONNEGSG    ;
!! Prt
 INDPRT_ž    ;
! Cond
: COND ;
!! Imprt
	IMPRTSG2    ;
	IMPRTPL1	;
	IMPRTPL2	;
	IMPRTCONNEG ;

!! Jus
 JUS_gõ	;
!! Qvo
 QUO-STEM_ji	;

!! participles
 ACTPRSPRC ;
 ACTPRFPRC_SG-nd/PL-nõd ;
:%^VowsRM PSSPRSPRC ;
:%^VowsRM	PSSPRFPRCSG    ;
!!5

LEXICON V-01_SĪEDÕ 
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = : 7 sīedõ:sīe
!! * Yaml: **siiedw**
:d   GER_sõ   ;
   INF_dõ	  ;
   SUP_mõ       ;
   INDPRSPL1    ;
   INDPRSPL2_tõ    ;
   INDPRSPL3    ;
   INDCONNEGPL1 ;
   INDCONNEGPL2 ;
   INDCONNEGPL3 ;
   INDPRSSG1-STEM    ;
   INDCONNEGSG    ;
!! Prt
: INDPRT_i    ;
! Cond
 COND ;
!! Imprt
	IMPRTSG2    ;
	IMPRTPL1	;
	IMPRTPL2	;
	IMPRTCONNEG ;

!! Jus
 JUS_gõ	;
!! Qvo
 QUO-STEM_ji	;

!! participles
 ACTPRSPRC ;
 ACTPRFPRC_SG-nd/PL-nõd ;
 PSSPRSPRC ;
 PSSPRFPRCSG    ;

+Act+PrfPrc:n NMN_SĪEND	   ;
!! 8
LEXICON V-01_SǬDÕ
!! sǭdõ:s
:ǭd   GER_sõ   ;
:ǭ   INF_dõ	  ;
:ǭ   SUP-STEM_mõ	  ; 
:ǭ   INDPRSSG1-STEM    ;
:ǭ   INDCONNEGSG    ;
!! Prt
:a INDPRT_i    ;
! Cond
:ǭ COND ;
!! Imprt
:ǭ	IMPRTSG2    ;
:ǭ	IMPRTPL1	;
:ǭ	IMPRTPL2	;
:ǭ	IMPRTCONNEG ;

!! Jus
:ǭ JUS_gõ	;
!! Qvo
:ǭ QUO-STEM_ji	;

!! participles
:ǭ ACTPRSPRC ;
:ǭ  ACTPRFPRC_SG-nd/PL-nõd ;
:ǭ PSSPRSPRC ;
:ǭ PSSPRFPRCSG    ;
!! 9
!! 9
LEXICON V-01_JŪODÕ
!! jūodõ:vī
:d   GER_sõ   ;
   INF_dõ	  ;
   SUP-STEM_mõ	  ; 
   INDPRSSG1-STEM    ;
   INDCONNEGSG    ;
!! Prt
 INDPRT_i    ;
! Cond
: COND ;
!! Imprt
	IMPRTSG2    ;
	IMPRTPL1	;
	IMPRTPL2	;
	IMPRTCONNEG ;

!! Jus
 JUS_gõ	;
!! Qvo
 QUO-STEM_ji	;

!! participles
 ACTPRSPRC ;
 ACTPRFPRC_SG-nd/PL-nõd ;
 PSSPRSPRC ;
 PSSPRFPRCSG    ;
!! 10

!!
LEXICON V-01_JEʼLLÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 13 jeʼllõ, 18 astõ, 19 võttõ, 24 vieʼddõ, 25 maksõ, 26 tappõ
:%^Stress2to1 GER_s     ;
:%^Stress2to1 INF_ZERO      ;
:%^StodRM%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ā SUP-STEM_m        ;
:%^StodRM%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ā   INDPRSSG1-STEM    ;
:%^ConsSh%^VowsRM   INDCONNEGSG    ;
:%^StodRM%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ī INDPRT_zt/ztõ ;
!+Ind+Sg+ConNeg:	K    ;

!! Cond
:%^StodRM%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ā COND ;
!! Imprt
:%^StodRM%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ā        IMPRTSG2    ;
:%^StodRM%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ā        IMPRTPL1        ;
:%^StodRM%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ā        IMPRTPL2        ;
:%^StodRM%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ā        IMPRTCONNEG ;
       IMPRTCONNEGSG2 ;
!! Jus
:%^StodRM%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ā JUS_g ;
!! Qvo
:%^StodRM%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ā QUO-STEM_ji    ;

!! participles
 ACTPRSPRC ;
 ACTPRFPRC_n ;
:%^ConsSh%^VowsRM PSSPRSPRC ;
:%^ConsSh%^VowsRM PSSPRFPRCSG    ;

!:%^Stress2to1%^VowsRM%^ConsRM	PSSPRFPRCSG    ;
!+Pss+PrfPrc:tõd			NMN_TAPTÕD ;
