src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
alā+V+Aux:alā V-AUX_ÄʼB  "älä" ;
bougõ+V:bougõ IV_OUŖÕ  "ärjyä" ;
doŗŗõ+V:doŗŗõ IV_ARRÕ  "niskoitella" ;
eļļõ+V:eļļõ TV_ARRÕ  "öljytä" ;
gräbžõ+V:gräʼbžõ IV_AʼILÕ  "rapista" ;
interesīerõ+V:interesīerõ IV_KŪLÕ  "olla kiinnostunut" ;
irrõ+V:irrõ IV_ARRÕ  "irvistää" ;
izt+V+Aux:iʼzt V-AUX_ÄʼB  "et" ;
jarātuņšlõ+V:jarā#tuņšlõ TV_UMBLÕ  "todeta" ;
jutlõ+V:jutlõ TV_MÕTLÕ  "saarnata" ;
jōdõ+V:jǭʼdõ IV_ĪʼEDÕ  "jäähtyä" ;
kaņțõ+V:kāņțõ TV_AŖŠTÕ  "reunustaa" ;
keijõ+V:keijõ TV_KEIJÕ  "tahkoa" ;
klebžõ+V:kleʼbžõ IV_AʼILÕ  "kalista" ;
kläbbõrtõ+V:kläʼbbõrtõ IV_ÄʼBȚÕ  "ryskää" ;
klāmbartõ+V:klāmbartõ TV_KĪTÕ  "nitoa" ;
koļkõ+V:kōļkõ IV_TUNDÕ  "maleksia" ;
kriukšõ+V:krīukšõ IV_AŖŠTÕ  "vinkua" ;
krōpšõ+V:krǭpšõ TV_KŪLDÕ  "raapia" ;
krōjõ+V:krǭʼjõ TV_AʼILÕ  "säästää" ;
kīerlõ+V:kīerlõ IV_UMBLÕ  "kieriskellä" ;
kīskõ+V:kīskõ TV_KĪSKÕ  "kiskoa" ;
kūmartõ+V:kūmartõ IV_KĪTÕ  "kumartua" ;
kǟtõ+V:kǟʼtõ TV_ÄʼBȚÕ  "kävelyttää" ;
kōrõ+V:kǭrõ TV_KŪLÕ  "himoita" ;
laiglõ+V:laʼiglõ IV_MǞʼDLÕ  "levitä" ;
ležgõldõ+V:leʼžgõldõ IV_ÄʼBȚÕ  "lähestyä" ;
lūotšõ+V:lūʼotšõ TV_ĪʼEDÕ  "taivuttaa" ;
maitõ+V:māitõ IV_AŖŠTÕ  "pilaantua" ;
maršõ+V:maršõ IV_KŪLDÕ  "marssia" ;
maskīerõ+V:maskīerõ IV_KŪLÕ  "naamioitua" ;
maņțõ+V:māņțõ TV_AŖŠTÕ  "torjua" ;
merkõ+V:mērkõ TV_TUNDÕ  "merkitä" ;
muidlõ+V:muʼidlõ IV_MǞʼDLÕ  "hymyillä" ;
mõllõ+V:mõllõ IV_ARRÕ  "riehua" ;
mõllõ+V:mõllõ TV_ARRÕ  "penkoa" ;
mõtlõ+V:mõtlõ TV_MÕTLÕ  "ajatella" ;
mõtlõ+V+Aux:mõtlõ V-AUX_MÕTLÕ  "aikoa" ;
mǟdlõ+V:mǟʼdlõ TV_MǞʼDLÕ  "muistaa" ;
nagrõ+V:naʼgrõ TV_NAʼGRÕ  "nauraa" ;
nopkõ+V:nopkõ TV_KŪLDÕ  "poimia" ;
nīskõ+V:nīskõ TV_KĪSKÕ  "niistää" ;
nūškõ+V:nūškõ TV_KĪSKÕ  "haistaa" ;
nōļatõ+V:nǭļatõ TV_KĪTÕ  "hauskuttaa" ;
oudõ+V:ōdõ TV_OUDÕ  "hautoa" ;
outõ+V:ōtõ TV_OUTÕ  "hauduttaa" ;
ouŗõ+V:ouŗõ IV_OUŖÕ  "karjua" ;
ovstõ+V:oʼvstõ TV_ÄʼBȚÕ  "kunnioittaa" ;
palkõ+V:pālkõ IV_TUNDÕ  "palvella" ;
peizõ+V:peizõ IV_KEIJÕ  "lämmetä" ;
piḑīks+V+Aux:piḑī V-AUX_PIḐĪKS  "pitäisi" ;
piḑīm+V+Aux:piḑīm V-AUX_PIḐĪKS  "pitää" ;
prīetsõ+V:prīʼetsõ IV_ĪʼEDÕ  "iloita" ;
puiklõ+V:puiklõ IV_UMBLÕ  "keksiä verukkeita" ;
puslõ+V:puslõ IV_MÕTLÕ  "puskea" ;
pīlatõ+V:pīlatõ IV_KĪTÕ  "pilvistyä" ;
pūgõ+V:pūʼgõ TV_AʼILÕ  "puoskaroida" ;
pǟlõouŗõ+V:pǟlõ#ouŗõ IV_OUŖÕ  "karjahtaa" ;
pȯigõ+V:pȯigõ IV_PȮIMÕ  "poikia" ;
pȯimõ+V:pȯimõ TV_PȮIMÕ  "punoa" ;
pȯlgõ+V:pȯlgõ TV_PȮIMÕ  "väheksyä" ;
pȯlgõ+V:pȯlgõ TV_PȮIMÕ  "peruuttaa" ;
pȯrtõ+V:pūortõ TV_PȮRTÕ  "viekoitella" ;
radļõ+V:raʼdļõ IV_NAʼGRÕ  "kirvellä" ;
radļõ+V:raʼdļõ TV_NAʼGRÕ  "hakata" ;
reslõ+V:reslõ IV_MÕTLÕ  "röhistä" ;
ruoikõ+V+Aux:rūoikõ V-AUX_TUNDÕ  "kiirehtiä" ;
rõkāndõ+V+Aux:rõkāndõ V-AUX_KĪTÕ  "sopia" ;
rōstõ+V+Aux:rǭstõ V-AUX_KĪTÕ  "olla tapana" ;
sintõ+V:sīntõ TV_AŖŠTÕ  "synnyttää" ;
sipšlõ+V:sipšlõ TV_UMBLÕ  "änkyttää" ;
skollõ+V:skoʼllõ TV_SVAʼRRÕ  "huuhdella" ;
skrõuvõ+V:skrõuvõ TV_KŪLÕ  "ruuvata" ;
spõrkšlõ+V:spõrkšlõ IV_UMBLÕ  "rämistä" ;
strempõ+V:strēmpõ TV_TUNDÕ  "tallata" ;
suoḑīkšõ+V:suoḑīkšõ IV_KŪLDÕ  "sotia" ;
svarrõ+V:svaʼrrõ TV_SVAʼRRÕ  "punnita" ;
sä+V:sä TV_SÄ  "he, ota" ;
sägīd+V:sägīd TV_SÄ  "hekää" ;
sõvlõ+V:sõʼvlõ IV_AʼILÕ  "syyhytä" ;
sõņšlõ+V:sõʼņšlõ TV_MǞʼDLÕ  "kinastella" ;
sūoḑõ+V:sūʼoḑõ TV_ĪʼEDÕ  "rangaista" ;
taplõ+V:taplõ IV_MÕTLÕ  "tapella" ;
tirpõ+V:tiʼrpõ IV_ĪʼEDÕ  "turtua" ;
toņņõ+V:toņņõ TV_ARRÕ  "hajottaa" ;
tänkõ+V:tǟnkõ IV_AŖŠTÕ  "roikkua" ;
tärkšlõ+V:tärkšlõ TV_UMBLÕ  "matkia" ;
tīkõ+V+Aux:tīkõ V-AUX_KŪLDÕ  "koettaa" ;
tīedslõ+V:tīʼedslõ TV_MǞʼDLÕ  "työstää" ;
tūldõ+V:tūldõ TV_KŪLDÕ  "tuultaa" ;
tūoḑõ+V+Aux:tūʼoḑõ V-AUX_ĪʼEDÕ  "saada" ;
tǟntõ+V:tǟʼntõ IV_ÄʼBȚÕ  "osoittaa" ;
ulzmõtlõ+V:ulz#mõtlõ TV_MÕTLÕ  "sepittää" ;
verkõ+V:vērkõ TV_TUNDÕ  "tihentää" ;
vilkõ+V:vīlkõ IV_TUNDÕ  "vilahtaa" ;
vitsīņtõ+V:vitsīņtõ IV_KĪTÕ  "liehua" ;
võrkõ+V+Aux:vȭrkõ V-AUX_TUNDÕ  "viitsiä" ;
vǟgrõ+V:vǟʼgrõ IV_MǞʼDLÕ  "kieriskellä" ;
vǟrgõ+V:vǟʼrgõ TV_AʼILÕ  "orjailla" ;
vȯdlõ+V:vȯʼdlõ TV_NAʼGRÕ  "odottaa" ;
ädāstõ+V:ädāstõ TV_KĪTÕ  "hermostuttaa" ;
ēḑõ+V:ēʼḑõ TV_ĪʼEDÕ  "pukeutua" ;
ītõ+V:īʼtõ TV_ÄʼBȚÕ  "yhdistää" ;
šmūorõ+V:šmūorõ TV_KŪLÕ  "hauduttaa" ;
šūlõ+V:šūlõ IV_KŪLÕ  "tihkua visvaa" ;
ȭrikšõ+V:ȭrikšõ IV_KŪLDÕ  "hankautua" ;
